Idaho, session 2025, H0405.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1613. SAFE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES REQUIRED. (1) Definition. As
used in this section, "public school facilities" means the physical plant of
improved or unimproved real property owned or operated by a school district,
a charter school, or a school for children in any grades kindergarten through
twelve (12) that is operated by the state of Idaho, including school build-
ings, administration buildings, playgrounds, athletic fields, etc., used by
schoolchildren or school personnel in the normal course of providing a gen-
eral, uniform and thorough system of public, free common schools, but does
not include areas, buildings or parts of buildings closed from or not used
in the normal course of providing a general, uniform and thorough system of
public, free common schools. The aspects of a safe environment conducive
to learning as provided by section 33-1612, Idaho Code, that pertain to the
physical plant used to provide a general, uniform and thorough system of pub-
lic, free common schools are hereby defined as those necessary to comply with
the safety and health requirements set forth in this section.
(2) Inspection. It is the duty of the board of trustees of every school
district and the governing body for other public schools described in sub-
section (1) of this section at least once in every school year to require an
independent inspection of the school district's or other entity's school
facilities to determine whether those school facilities comply with codes
addressing safety and health standards for facilities, including elec-
trical, plumbing, mechanical, elevator, fire safety, boiler safety, life
safety, structural, snow loading, and sanitary codes, adopted by or pursuant
to the Idaho uniform school building safety act, chapter 80, title 39, Idaho
Code, adopted by the state fire marshal, adopted by generally applicable
local ordinances, or adopted by rule of the state board of education and
applicable to school facilities. If not provided for under existing codes,
such inspection shall include testing for radon, mold, and lead, as pro-
vided for in this subsection or as necessary under the circumstances. Radon
testing shall be required for those public school facilities with basements
that are regularly occupied by students, including for classroom instruc-
tion or other school-related activities, or if a facility's substratum has
been identified as being in a radon-prone area, if the construction of the


facility did not include radon-resistant features or techniques, or if such
information is unknown. Radon testing shall be conducted when a building
is operational. Mold testing shall be required if mold may reasonably be
suspected of developing or existing due to factors that include but are not
limited to excess moisture, water leaks, improperly maintained air condi-
tioning or heating systems, warping of walls or ceilings, or visible spots of
mold or mildew. Lead testing shall be required if a public school facility
was constructed before 1978 or if it has lead pipes, signs of decay in pipes
that may be evidenced by frequent leaks, corrosion or pitting in plumbing
fixtures, water stains on sinks or toilets, water discoloration, water with
a metallic taste, water with an abnormal odor, or peeling paint. The test-
ing provided for in this subsection and any related subsequent abatement
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall align with any relevant
rules, health standards, and maximum contaminant level goals established or
officially recognized by the Idaho department of environmental quality and
the Idaho department of health and welfare. Retesting for mold or lead shall
be conducted one (1) year after the conclusion of any necessary abatement of
identified mold or lead. The inspection shall be done pursuant to chapter
80, title 39, Idaho Code, or by an independent inspector professionally
qualified to conduct inspections under the applicable code. The results of
the inspection shall be presented to the administrator of the division of
occupational and professional licenses and the board of trustees or other
governing body for its review and consideration.
(3) Abatement required -- Reporting. The board of trustees or other
governing body shall require that the unsafe or unhealthy conditions be
abated and shall instruct the school district's or other entity's personnel
to take necessary steps to abate unsafe or unhealthy conditions. Abatement
of unsafe or unhealthy conditions in public school facilities shall also
include mitigation of radon. The board of trustees or other governing body
must shall issue a report in the same school year in which the inspections are
made declaring whether any unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified have
not been abated. The state board of education shall, by rule, provide for
uniform reporting of unsafe and unhealthy conditions and for uniform report-
ing of abatement or absence of abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions.
Copies of such reports shall be provided to the administrator of the division
of occupational and professional licenses and the board of trustees of the
school district. Additionally, the school district board of trustees or the
governing body for other public schools shall issue a report to the parents
and legal guardians of affected students and to any affected staff regarding
any violation of the codes provided for in subsection (2) of this section or
any serious safety hazard or imminent safety hazard as those terms are de-
fined in section 39-8004, Idaho Code. Any school district board of trustees
or public charter school governing board that is determined to have violated
the provisions of this subsection regarding reporting requirements may be
assessed a fine by the division of occupational and professional licenses of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation and not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of continuing violation.
(4) Costs of and plan of abatement. If the school district or other en-
tity described in subsection (1) of this section can abate all unsafe or un-
healthy conditions identified with the funds available to the school dis-


trict or other entity, it shall do so, and it need not separately account for
the costs of abatement nor segregate funds expended for abatement . If the
school district or other entity cannot abate all unsafe or unhealthy con-
ditions identified with the funds available to it, the board of trustees or
other governing body shall direct that a plan of abatement be prepared. The
plan of abatement shall provide a timetable that shall begin no later than
the following school year and that shall provide for abatement with all de-
liberate speed of unsafe and unhealthy conditions identified. The abatement
plan shall be submitted to the administrator of the division of occupational
and professional licenses. The school district or other entity shall imme-
diately begin to implement its plan of abatement and must shall separately
account for its costs of abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions and
separately segregate funds for the abatement of unsafe and unhealthy condi-
tions as required by subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Special provisions for implementation of plan of abatement.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law concerning expenditure
of lottery moneys distributed to the school district or other entity,
all lottery moneys provided to the school district or other entity for
a school year in which the school district cannot abate unsafe or un-
healthy conditions identified and not legally encumbered to other uses
at the time and all lottery moneys for following school years shall be
segregated and expended exclusively for abatement of unsafe and un-
healthy conditions identified until all of the unhealthy and unsafe
unsafe and unhealthy conditions identified are abated, provided, if the
school district has obtained a loan from the school safety and health
revolving loan and grant fund, then the provisions of section 33-1017,
Idaho Code, and the conditions of the loan shall determine the use of the
school district's lottery moneys during the term of the loan.
(b) If the lottery moneys referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion will, in the board of trustees' or other governing bodies' esti-
mation, be insufficient to abate the unsafe and unhealthy conditions
identified, the plan of abatement shall identify additional sources of
funds to complete the abatement of the unsafe and unhealthy conditions.
The board of trustees may choose from among the following sources, or
from other sources of its own identification, but the plan of abatement
must shall identify sufficient sources of funds for abatement.
(i) If the school district is not levying under chapter 8, ti-
tle 33, Idaho Code, at the maximum levies allowed by law for levies
that may be imposed by a board of trustees without an election, the
board of trustees may increase any of those levies as allowed by
law for the school year following the school year in which it was
unable to abate unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified.
(ii) If the school district is levying under chapter 8, title 33,
Idaho Code, at the maximum levies allowed by law for levies that
may be imposed by the board of trustees without an election; or, if
after increasing those levies to the maximum levies allowed by law
for levies that may be imposed by the board of trustees without an
election, there will still be insufficient funds to abate unsafe
or unhealthy conditions identified, then the school district, af-
ter giving notice and conducting a hearing, may declare a finan-


cial emergency and/or may apply for a loan or, if eligible, an in-
terest grant from the school safety and health revolving loan and
grant fund as provided in section 33-1017, Idaho Code, to obtain
funds to abate the unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified.
(iii) Upon the declaration of a financial emergency, the board of
trustees shall have the power to impose a reduction in force, to
freeze some or all salaries in the school district, and/or to sus-
pend some or all contracts that may be legally suspended upon the
declaration of a financial emergency; provided, that when a board
of trustees declares a financial emergency, or when a declaration
of a financial emergency is imposed by the state treasurer pur-
suant to section 33-1017, Idaho Code, and there is a reduction in
force, some or all salaries are frozen, or some contracts are sus-
pended, the payments to the school district under the foundation
program of chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code, and in particular the
staff allowances under that chapter, shall not be reduced during
the duration of the financial emergency as a result of a reduction
in force, frozen salaries, or suspended salaries from what the
staff allowance would be without the reduction in force, frozen
salaries or suspended contracts.
(c) All costs of abatement for a program implementing plans of abate-
ment under this subsection (5) of this section must shall be separately
accounted for and documented with regard to abatement of each unsafe or
unhealthy condition identified. Funds obtained under section 33-1017,
Idaho Code, must shall be used exclusively to abate unsafe or unhealthy
conditions identified. Funds obtained pursuant to section 33-1017,
Idaho Code, in excess of funds necessary to abate unsafe or unhealthy
conditions identified must shall be returned as provided in section
33-1017, Idaho Code. Return of these funds shall be judicially enforce-
able as provided in section 33-1017, Idaho Code.
(6) Reporting violations. Any employee or person authorized to act on
behalf of an employee who communicates in good faith a violation or suspected
violation of any provision of this section shall be protected under the pro-
visions of section 6-2104, Idaho Code, regarding protection of public em-
ployees.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.